Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.160

Tax on gross revenues authorized.

The county shall have the power to levy a tax on the system of sewerage and/or water operated by the county or counties as authorized by this chapter, not to exceed eight percent per annum, on the gross revenues, to be paid to the county's general fund for payment of all costs of planning, financing, construction and operation of the system.

[ 1967 c 72 s 16.]